Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-819
Action; service of summons; effect.

Every person who sells, distributes, or acquires possession with intent to sell, exhibit, or distribute any of the work, material, conduct or live performance described in section 28-808, after service upon him of summons in such action, shall be chargeable with knowledge of the contents thereof in any subsequent prosecution.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 175.